test/src/morphology/noun-párra_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Normal even-syllabla nouns. The nouns to nomen derivations are also tested. Lexicon MUORRA, EHTTA, NOADE, AHKA, GÁDDE, DARRHA, SÁMEGIEL, ÅLGGO and MIEHTE

Tests:
  Noun - ieddne: # MUORRA
    ieddne+N+Sg+Nom: ieddne 
    ieddne+N+Sg+Gen: iedne
    ieddne+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ædnáma
    ieddne+N+Sg+Acc: iednev
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ine: iednen 
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ill: æddnáj
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ela: iednes
    ieddne+N+Sg+Com: iednijn 
    ieddne+N+Pl+Nom: iedne
    ieddne+N+Pl+Gen: iednij
    ieddne+N+Pl+Acc: iednijt
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ine: iednijn
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ill: iednijda
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: iednijdiseda
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ela: iednijs
    ieddne+N+Pl+Com: iednij
    ieddne+N+Ess: ieddnen
    ieddne+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ædnásj
    ieddne+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ædnátjasj
    ieddne+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: iednedibme
    ieddne+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [iednegahtes, iednedahtes]
    ieddne+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: ædnálasj
    ieddne+N+Abe: iednedak

  Noun - goahte: # MUORRA
    goahte+N+Sg+Nom: goahte
    goahte+N+Sg+Acc: goadev
    goahte+N+Sg+Com: gådijn
    goahte+N+Ess: goahten
    goahte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: goadásj

  Noun - irgge: # NOADE
    irgge+N+Sg+Nom: irgge
    irgge+N+Sg+Acc: irggev
    irgge+N+Pl+Com: irggij
    irgge+N+Ess: irggen
    irgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: irggásj
    irgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: irggátjasj
    irgge+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: irggedibme
    irgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [irggegahtes, irggedahtes]
    irgge+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: irggálasj
    irgge+N+Abe: irggedak

  Noun - jávrre: # MUORRA
    jávrre+N+Sg+Nom: jávrre 
    jávrre+N+Sg+Ill: jávrráj
    jávrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jávrásj

  Noun - áhkko: # MUORRA
    áhkko+N+Sg+Nom: áhkko 
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ine: áhkon 
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ill: áhkkuj
    áhkko+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: áhkusj

  Noun - girkko: # NOADE
    girkko+N+Sg+Nom: girkko 
    girkko+N+Sg+Gen: girkko
    girkko+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: girkkuma
    girkko+N+Sg+Acc: girkkov
    girkko+N+Sg+Ine: girkkon 
    girkko+N+Sg+Ill: girkkuj
    girkko+N+Sg+Ela: girkkos
    girkko+N+Sg+Com: girkkojn 
    girkko+N+Pl+Nom: girkko
    girkko+N+Pl+Gen: girkkoj
    girkko+N+Pl+Acc: girkkojt
    girkko+N+Pl+Ine: girkkojn
    girkko+N+Pl+Ill: girkkojda
    girkko+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: girkkojdiseda
    girkko+N+Pl+Ela: girkkojs
    girkko+N+Pl+Com: girkkoj
    girkko+N+Ess: girkkon
    girkko+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: girkkusj


  Noun - viellja: # MUORRA
    viellja+N+Sg+Nom: viellja 
    viellja+N+Sg+Ine: vieljan 
    viellja+N+Sg+Ill: vielljaj
    viellja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vieljasj

  Noun - gussa: # MUORRA
    gussa+N+Sg+Nom: gussa 
    gussa+N+Sg+Ine: gusán 
    gussa+N+Sg+Ill: gussaj
    gussa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gusásj

  Noun - snjuktja: # MUORRA
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Nom: [snjuktja,sjnjuktja]
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ine: [snjuvtjan,sjnjuvtjan]
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ill: [snjuktjaj,sjnjuktjaj]

  Noun - bierjjedahka: # AHKA
    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Nom: bierjjedahka 
    bierjjedahka+N+Pl+Nom: bierjjedagá 
    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Ill: bierjjedahkaj
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bierjjedagásj
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bierjjedagátjasj
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: bierjjedagádibme
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [bierjjedagágahtes, bierjjedagádahtes]
    bierjjedahka+N+Abe: bierjjedagádak

  Noun - gåhppå: # MUORRA
    gåhppå+N+Sg+Nom: gåhppå 
    gåhppå+N+Sg+Ine: gåhpån 
    gåhppå+N+Sg+Ill: gåhppåj

  Noun - muohtá: # NOADE
    muohtá+N+Sg+Nom: muohtá 
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ine: muohtán 
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ill: muohtáj

  Noun - svilli: # MUORRA
    svilli+N+Sg+Nom: svilli 
    svilli+N+Sg+Ine: svilin 
    svilli+N+Sg+Ill: svillij

  Noun - universitehtta: # EHTTA
    universitehtta+N+Sg+Nom: universitehtta 
    universitehtta+N+Sg+Ine: universitehtan 
    universitehtta+N+Sg+Ill: universitehttaj
    universitehtta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: universitehtasj
    universitehtta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: universitehtatjasj
    universitehtta+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: universitehtadibme
    universitehtta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [universitehtagahtes, universitehtadahtes]
    universitehtta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: universitehtalasj
    universitehtta+N+Abe: universitehtadak

  Noun - boassjo: # GÁDDE
    boassjo+N+Sg+Nom: boassjo
    boassjo+N+Sg+Gen: boassjo
    boassjo+N+Sg+Ill: boassjuj
    boassjo+N+Pl+Ill: boassjojda
    boassjo+N+Ess: boassjon

  Noun - dulvve: # GÁDDE
    dulvve+N+Sg+Nom: dulvve
    dulvve+N+Sg+Acc: dulvev
    dulvve+N+Sg+Ill: dulvváj
    dulvve+N+Sg+Com: dulvijn
    dulvve+N+Ess: dulvven
    dulvve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dulvásj

  Noun - oajvve: # GÁDDE
    oajvve+N+Sg+Nom: oajvve 
    oajvve+N+Sg+Gen: oajve
    oajvve+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: oajváma
    oajvve+N+Sg+Acc: oajvev
    oajvve+N+Sg+Ine: oajven 
    oajvve+N+Sg+Ill: oajvváj
    oajvve+N+Sg+Ela: oajves
    oajvve+N+Sg+Com: åjvijn 
    oajvve+N+Pl+Nom: oajve
    oajvve+N+Pl+Gen: åjvij
    oajvve+N+Pl+Acc: åjvijt
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ine: åjvijn
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ill: åjvijda
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: åjvijdiseda
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ela: åjvijs
    oajvve+N+Pl+Com: åjvij
    oajvve+N+Ess: oajvven
    oajvve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oajvásj

  Noun - tjaktja: # GÁDDE
    tjaktja+N+Sg+Nom: tjaktja
    tjaktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjavtja
    tjaktja+N+Sg+Ill: tjaktjaj
    tjaktja+N+Pl+Ill: tjavtjajda
    tjaktja+N+Ess: tjaktjan
    tjaktja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavtjasj
    tjaktja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavtjatjasj
    tjaktja+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: tjavtjadibme
    tjaktja+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [tjavtjagahtes, tjavtjadahtes]
    tjaktja+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: tjavtjalasj
    tjaktja+N+Abe: tjavtjadak

  Noun - berajgiella: # SÁMEGIEL
    berajgiella+N+Sg+Nom: berajgiella
    berajgiella+N+Sg+Acc: berajgielav
    berajgiella+N+Sg+Com: berajgielajn
    berajgiella+N+Ess: berajgiellan
    berajgiella+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berajgielasj
    berajgiella+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berajgielatjasj
    berajgiella+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: berajgieladibme
    berajgiella+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [berajgielagahtes, tberajgieladahtes]
    berajgiella+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: berajgielalasj
    berajgiella+N+Abe: berajgieladak

  Noun - báktedarrha: # DARRHA
    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Nom: báktedarrha
    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Gen: báktedarhá
    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Ill: báktedarrhaj
    báktedarrha+N+Pl+Ill: báktedarhájda
    báktedarrha+N+Ess: báktedarrhan
    báktedarrha+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: báktedarhásj
    báktedarrha+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: báktedarhátjasj
    báktedarrha+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: báktedarhádibme
    báktedarrha+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [báktedarhágahtes, báktedarhádahtes]
    báktedarrha+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: báktedarhálasj
    báktedarrha+N+Abe: berajgieladak

  Noun - boaksa: # BOAKSA
    boaksa+N+Sg+Nom: boaksa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Gen: båksa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Ill: boaksaj
    boaksa+N+Pl+Ill: båksajda
    boaksa+N+Ess: boaksan
    boaksa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båksasj
    boaksa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båksatjasj
    boaksa+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: båksadibme
    boaksa+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [båksagahtes, båksadahtes]
    boaksa+N+Abe: båksadak

  Noun - vuolle: # ÅLGGO 
    vuolle+N+Sg+Nom: vuolle
    vuolle+N+Sg+Gen: vuole
    vuolle+N+Sg+Ill: [] # Without ine, ela and ill. It's not the yoik.
    vuolle+N+Sg+Ine: [] #
    vuolle+N+Ess: vuollen
    vuolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuolásj
    vuolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuolátjasj
    vuolle+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: vuoledibme
    vuolle+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [vuolegahtes, vuoledahtes]
    vuolle+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: vuolálasj
    vuolle+N+Abe: vuoledak
